Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-802
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the State Procurement Act are to establish a standardized, open, and fair process for selection of contracts and to create an accurate reporting of expended funds for such contracts. This process shall promote a standardized method of selection for state contracts, assuring a fair assessment of qualifications and capabilities for project completion or compliance with specifications. There shall also be an accountable, efficient reporting method of expenditures for these contracts.

Laws 2003, LB 626, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB858, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 73-501;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 2.